test/src/gt-desc-yamls/A-Oct_2016_gt-desc.yaml
      katkine+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [katkiseikski, katkisikski]
      katkine+A+Pl+Tra: katkisteks
      katkine+A+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: [katkiseiks, katkisiks]
      katkine+A+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: katkistenigi
      katkine+A+Pl+Trm: katkisteni
      katkine+A+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: katkisetagi
      katkine+A+Sg+Abe: katkiseta
      katkine+A+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: katkiseltki
      katkine+A+Sg+Abl: katkiselt
      katkine+A+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: katkiselgi
      katkine+A+Sg+Ade: katkisel
      katkine+A+Sg+All+Foc/gi: katkiselegi
      katkine+A+Sg+All: katkisele
      katkine+A+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: katkisegagi
      katkine+A+Sg+Com: katkisega
      katkine+A+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: katkisestki
      katkine+A+Sg+Ela: katkisest
      katkine+A+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: katkisenagi
      katkine+A+Sg+Ess: katkisena
      katkine+A+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: katkisegi
      katkine+A+Sg+Gen: katkise
      katkine+A+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: katkisessegi
      katkine+A+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: katkissegi
      katkine+A+Sg+Ill: katkisesse
      katkine+A+Sg+Ill+Usage/Rare: katkisse
      katkine+A+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: katkiseski
      katkine+A+Sg+Ine: katkises
      katkine+A+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: katkinegi
      katkine+A+Sg+Nom: katkine
      katkine+A+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: katkistki
      katkine+A+Sg+Par: katkist
      katkine+A+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: katkisekski
      katkine+A+Sg+Tra: katkiseks
      katkine+A+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: katkisenigi
      katkine+A+Sg+Trm: katkiseni
      kaunis+A+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: kaunitetagi
      kaunis+A+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [kauneitagi, kaunistetagi]
      kaunis+A+Pl+Abe: kauniteta
      kaunis+A+Pl+Abe+Usage/Rare: [kauneita, kaunisteta]
      kaunis+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: kauniteltki
      kaunis+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [kauneiltki, kaunisteltki]
      kaunis+A+Pl+Abl: kaunitelt
      kaunis+A+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: [kauneilt, kaunistelt]
      kaunis+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: kaunitelgi
      kaunis+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [kauneilgi, kaunistelgi]
      kaunis+A+Pl+Ade: kaunitel
      kaunis+A+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: [kauneil, kaunistel]
      kaunis+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi: kaunitelegi
      kaunis+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [kauneilegi, kaunistelegi]
      kaunis+A+Pl+All: kaunitele
      kaunis+A+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: [kauneile, kaunistele]
      kaunis+A+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: kaunitegagi
      kaunis+A+Pl+Com+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [kauneigagi, kaunistegagi]
      kaunis+A+Pl+Com: kaunitega
      kaunis+A+Pl+Com+Usage/Rare: [kauneiga, kaunistega]
      kaunis+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: kaunitestki
      kaunis+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [kauneistki, kaunistestki]
      kaunis+A+Pl+Ela: kaunitest
      kaunis+A+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: [kauneist, kaunistest]
      kaunis+A+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: kaunitenagi
      kaunis+A+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [kauneinagi, kaunistenagi]
      kaunis+A+Pl+Ess: kaunitena
      kaunis+A+Pl+Ess+Usage/Rare: [kauneina, kaunistena]
      kaunis+A+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: kaunitegi
      kaunis+A+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kaunistegi
      kaunis+A+Pl+Gen: kaunite
      kaunis+A+Pl+Gen+Usage/Rare: kauniste
      kaunis+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: kaunitessegi
      kaunis+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [kauneissegi, kaunistessegi]
      kaunis+A+Pl+Ill: kaunitesse
      kaunis+A+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: [kauneisse, kaunistesse]
      kaunis+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: kauniteski
      kaunis+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [kauneiski, kaunisteski]
      kaunis+A+Pl+Ine: kaunites
      kaunis+A+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: [kauneis, kaunistes]
      kaunis+A+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: kaunidki
      kaunis+A+Pl+Nom: kaunid
      kaunis+A+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: kauneidki
      kaunis+A+Pl+Par: kauneid
      kaunis+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: kaunitekski
      kaunis+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [kauneikski, kaunistekski]
      kaunis+A+Pl+Tra: kauniteks
      kaunis+A+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: [kauneiks, kaunisteks]
      kaunis+A+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: kaunitenigi
      kaunis+A+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [kauneinigi, kaunistenigi]
      kaunis+A+Pl+Trm: kauniteni
      kaunis+A+Pl+Trm+Usage/Rare: [kauneini, kaunisteni]
      kaunis+A+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: kaunitagi
      kaunis+A+Sg+Abe: kaunita
      kaunis+A+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: kauniltki
      kaunis+A+Sg+Abl: kaunilt
      kaunis+A+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: kaunilgi
      kaunis+A+Sg+Ade: kaunil
      kaunis+A+Sg+All+Foc/gi: kaunilegi
      kaunis+A+Sg+All: kaunile
      kaunis+A+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: kaunigagi
      kaunis+A+Sg+Com: kauniga
      kaunis+A+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: kaunistki
      kaunis+A+Sg+Ela: kaunist
      kaunis+A+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: kauninagi
      kaunis+A+Sg+Ess: kaunina
      kaunis+A+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: kaunigi
      kaunis+A+Sg+Gen: kauni
      kaunis+A+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: kaunissegi
      kaunis+A+Sg+Ill: kaunisse
      kaunis+A+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: kauniski
      kaunis+A+Sg+Ine: kaunis
      kaunis+A+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: kauniski
      kaunis+A+Sg+Nom: kaunis
      kaunis+A+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: kaunistki
      kaunis+A+Sg+Par: kaunist
      kaunis+A+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: kaunikski
      kaunis+A+Sg+Tra: kauniks
      kaunis+A+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: kauninigi
      kaunis+A+Sg+Trm: kaunini
      kihvt+A+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: kihvtidetagi
      kihvt+A+Pl+Abe: kihvtideta
      kihvt+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: kihvtideltki
      kihvt+A+Pl+Abl: kihvtidelt
      kihvt+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: kihvtidelgi
      kihvt+A+Pl+Ade: kihvtidel
      kihvt+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi: kihvtidelegi
      kihvt+A+Pl+All: kihvtidele
      kihvt+A+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: kihvtidegagi
      kihvt+A+Pl+Com: kihvtidega
      kihvt+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: kihvtidestki
      kihvt+A+Pl+Ela: kihvtidest
      kihvt+A+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: kihvtidenagi
      kihvt+A+Pl+Ess: kihvtidena
      kihvt+A+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: kihvtidegi
      kihvt+A+Pl+Gen: kihvtide
      kihvt+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: kihvtidessegi
      kihvt+A+Pl+Ill: kihvtidesse
      kihvt+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: kihvtideski
      kihvt+A+Pl+Ine: kihvtides
      kihvt+A+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: kihvtidki
      kihvt+A+Pl+Nom: kihvtid
      kihvt+A+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: kihvtegi
      kihvt+A+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kihvtisidki
      kihvt+A+Pl+Par: kihvte
      kihvt+A+Pl+Par+Usage/Rare: kihvtisid
      kihvt+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: kihvtidekski
      kihvt+A+Pl+Tra: kihvtideks
      kihvt+A+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: kihvtidenigi
      kihvt+A+Pl+Trm: kihvtideni
      kihvt+A+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: kihvtitagi
      kihvt+A+Sg+Abe: kihvtita
      kihvt+A+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: kihvtiltki
      kihvt+A+Sg+Abl: kihvtilt
      kihvt+A+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: kihvtilgi
      kihvt+A+Sg+Ade: kihvtil
      kihvt+A+Sg+All+Foc/gi: kihvtilegi
      kihvt+A+Sg+All: kihvtile
      kihvt+A+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: kihvtigagi
      kihvt+A+Sg+Com: kihvtiga
      kihvt+A+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: kihvtistki
      kihvt+A+Sg+Ela: kihvtist
      kihvt+A+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: kihvtinagi
      kihvt+A+Sg+Ess: kihvtina
      kihvt+A+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: kihvtigi
      kihvt+A+Sg+Gen: kihvti
      kihvt+A+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: kihvtigi
      kihvt+A+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Hyp: kihvtissegi
      kihvt+A+Sg+Ill: kihvti
      kihvt+A+Sg+Ill+Usage/Hyp: kihvtisse
      kihvt+A+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: kihvtiski
      kihvt+A+Sg+Ine: kihvtis
      kihvt+A+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: kihvtki
      kihvt+A+Sg+Nom: kihvt
      kihvt+A+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: kihvtigi
      kihvt+A+Sg+Par: kihvti
      kihvt+A+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: kihvtikski
      kihvt+A+Sg+Tra: kihvtiks
      kihvt+A+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: kihvtinigi
      kihvt+A+Sg+Trm: kihvtini
      laulev+A+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: laulvatetagi
      laulev+A+Pl+Abe: laulvateta
      laulev+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: laulvateltki
      laulev+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: laulvailtki
      laulev+A+Pl+Abl: laulvatelt
      laulev+A+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: laulvailt
      laulev+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: laulvatelgi
      laulev+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: laulvailgi
      laulev+A+Pl+Ade: laulvatel
      laulev+A+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: laulvail
      laulev+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi: laulvatelegi
      laulev+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: laulvailegi
      laulev+A+Pl+All: laulvatele
      laulev+A+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: laulvaile
      laulev+A+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: laulvategagi
      laulev+A+Pl+Com: laulvatega
      laulev+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: laulvatestki
      laulev+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: laulvaistki
      laulev+A+Pl+Ela: laulvatest
      laulev+A+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: laulvaist
      laulev+A+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: laulvatenagi
      laulev+A+Pl+Ess: laulvatena
      laulev+A+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: laulvategi
      laulev+A+Pl+Gen: laulvate
      laulev+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: laulvatessegi
      laulev+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: laulvaissegi
      laulev+A+Pl+Ill: laulvatesse
      laulev+A+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: laulvaisse
      laulev+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: laulvateski
      laulev+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: laulvaiski
      laulev+A+Pl+Ine: laulvates
      laulev+A+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: laulvais
      laulev+A+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: laulvadki
      laulev+A+Pl+Nom: laulvad
      laulev+A+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: laulvaidki
      laulev+A+Pl+Par: laulvaid
      laulev+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: laulvatekski
      laulev+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: laulvaikski
      laulev+A+Pl+Tra: laulvateks
      laulev+A+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: laulvaiks
      laulev+A+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: laulvatenigi
      laulev+A+Pl+Trm: laulvateni
      laulev+A+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: laulvatagi
      laulev+A+Sg+Abe: laulvata
      laulev+A+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: laulvaltki
      laulev+A+Sg+Abl: laulvalt
      laulev+A+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: laulvalgi
      laulev+A+Sg+Ade: laulval
      laulev+A+Sg+All+Foc/gi: laulvalegi
      laulev+A+Sg+All: laulvale
      laulev+A+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: laulvagagi
      laulev+A+Sg+Com: laulvaga
      laulev+A+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: laulvastki
      laulev+A+Sg+Ela: laulvast
      laulev+A+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: laulvanagi
      laulev+A+Sg+Ess: laulvana
      laulev+A+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: laulvagi
      laulev+A+Sg+Gen: laulva
      laulev+A+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: laulvassegi
      laulev+A+Sg+Ill: laulvasse
      laulev+A+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: laulvaski
      laulev+A+Sg+Ine: laulvas
      laulev+A+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: laulevgi
      laulev+A+Sg+Nom: laulev
      laulev+A+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: laulvatki
      laulev+A+Sg+Par: laulvat
      laulev+A+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: laulvakski
      laulev+A+Sg+Tra: laulvaks
      laulev+A+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: laulvanigi
      laulev+A+Sg+Trm: laulvani
      ligida+A+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: ligidatetagi
      ligida+A+Pl+Abe: ligidateta
      ligida+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: ligidateltki
      ligida+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: ligidailtki
      ligida+A+Pl+Abl: ligidatelt
      ligida+A+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: ligidailt
      ligida+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: ligidatelgi
      ligida+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: ligidailgi
      ligida+A+Pl+Ade: ligidatel
      ligida+A+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: ligidail
      ligida+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi: ligidatelegi
      ligida+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: ligidailegi
      ligida+A+Pl+All: ligidatele
      ligida+A+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: ligidaile
      ligida+A+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: ligidategagi
      ligida+A+Pl+Com: ligidatega
      ligida+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: ligidatestki
      ligida+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: ligidaistki
      ligida+A+Pl+Ela: ligidatest
      ligida+A+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: ligidaist
      ligida+A+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: ligidatenagi
      ligida+A+Pl+Ess: ligidatena
      ligida+A+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: ligidategi
      ligida+A+Pl+Gen: ligidate
      ligida+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: ligidatessegi
      ligida+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: ligidaissegi
      ligida+A+Pl+Ill: ligidatesse
      ligida+A+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: ligidaisse
      ligida+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: ligidateski
      ligida+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: ligidaiski
      ligida+A+Pl+Ine: ligidates
      ligida+A+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: ligidais
      ligida+A+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: ligidadki
      ligida+A+Pl+Nom: ligidad
      ligida+A+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: ligidaidki
      ligida+A+Pl+Par: ligidaid
      ligida+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: ligidatekski
      ligida+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: ligidaikski
      ligida+A+Pl+Tra: ligidateks
      ligida+A+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: ligidaiks
      ligida+A+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: ligidatenigi
      ligida+A+Pl+Trm: ligidateni
      ligida+A+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: ligidatagi
      ligida+A+Sg+Abe: ligidata
      ligida+A+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: ligidaltki
      ligida+A+Sg+Abl: ligidalt
      ligida+A+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: ligidalgi
      ligida+A+Sg+Ade: ligidal
      ligida+A+Sg+All+Foc/gi: ligidalegi
      ligida+A+Sg+All: ligidale
      ligida+A+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: ligidagagi
      ligida+A+Sg+Com: ligidaga
      ligida+A+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: ligidastki
